lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/eks_8.twolc
Alphabet
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z â ê î ô û t2:0 %>:0;

Sets
Vow = a e o u i â ê î ô û ;
Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z t2 ;

Rules

"t insertion"
t2:t <=> .#. [ n | k ] i _ Vow ;

"w deletion"
w:0 <=>  _ %>: Cns ;


! lexc:
! akisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Sg <= :-(
! niakison <==== :-)
! 
! twolc:
! ni0akison
! nitakison
